Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-519
Right of person not associated member of protected series to information concerning protected series.

(a) A member of a series limited liability company which is not an associated member of a protected series of the company has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a member that is not a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the company under section 21-139.

(b) A person formerly an associated member of a protected series has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a person dissociated as a member of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the company under section 21-139.

(c) If an associated member of a protected series dies, the legal representative of the deceased associated member has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that the legal representative of a deceased member of a limited liability company has a right to information concerning the company under section 21-139.

(d) A protected-series manager of a protected series has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the company under section 21-139.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 20.
January 1, 2021